Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 2. Proceedings Upon Reversal

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

24 C.J.S. Criminal Law §§ 1420 to 1457, 1610 to 1637, 1660 to 1723.

§ 7-12-201.
Disposition of defendant.

If the judgment of conviction of any defendant committed to a state penal institution is reversed on appeal, the clerk of the supreme court shall forward to the department of corrections and to the administrator of the institution a certified copy of the court’s mandate directing the defendant’s discharge or a new trial.

Upon receipt of the mandate the director of the department of corrections shall direct the administrator either to discharge the defendant or return the defendant to the county jail of the county in which the defendant was convicted to be held in the custody of the sheriff pending a new trial.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 192; R.S. 1887, § 3358; R.S. 1899, § 5426; Laws 1901, ch. 63, § 5; C.S. 1910, § 6297; C.S. 1920, § 7593; R.S. 1931, § 33-1205; C.S. 1945, § 10-2005; W.S. 1957, § 7-296; W.S. 1977, § 7-12-205; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1987, ch. 157, § 4; 1992, ch. 25, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to Wyoming State penitentiary, and Wyoming women's center, see §

25-1-201

.